Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1115.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Heading change The chapter heading of title 41, chapter 57, Arizona Revised Statutes, is changed from "MISCELLANEOUS" to "STATE AGENCIES GENERALLY". Sec. 2. Title 41, chapter 57, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding article 2, to read: ARTICLE 2. ARIZONA HEALTH CARE COST CONTAINMENT SYSTEM START_STATUTE41-5911. Remote work; prohibition; definitions A. The Arizona health care cost containment system may not allow the agency's employees to work remotely. B. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Agency" means the Arizona health care cost containment system. 2. "Work remotely" means the employee's primary worksite is not the agency's worksite and the employee is not expected to regularly report to the agency's worksite on a regular and recurring basis. END_STATUTE